Texas, session 892, HB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter F to read as follows: SECTION 1.  Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter L to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER L. RIVER AUTHORITY COORDINATION IN EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLANNING. Sec. 418.501.  DEFINITIONS. In this section: (1)  "River authority" means a conservation and reclamation district created under Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution that has jurisdiction over water resources within a county, including but not limited to authorities created under Chapters 8501-8520, Special District Local Laws Code. (2)  "County emergency management plan" means the emergency management plan required under Section 418.106 of this code. Sec. 418.502.  COORDINATION REQUIREMENTS. Each river authority operating within a county shall coordinate and collaborate with that county's emergency management program in the development, review, and updating of the county's emergency management plan as it relates to: (1)  flood control and mitigation strategies; (2)  dam safety and potential dam failure scenarios; (3)  water resource management during emergencies; (4)  coordination of emergency communications regarding water-related hazards; (5)  evacuation routes and procedures related to flooding; (6)  post-disaster recovery planning for water infrastructure; and (7)  any other water-related emergency management matters within the river authority's jurisdiction or expertise. Sec. 503.  COORDINATION ACTIVITIES. The coordination required by this section shall include: (1)  Regular consultation between the river authority and county emergency management personnel, with meetings held at least annually or more frequently as determined necessary by either party; (2)  Sharing of relevant data, studies, and technical information related to flood risks, dam safety, and water infrastructure that may be useful for emergency planning purposes; (3)  Joint participation in emergency planning exercises and training when practicable; (4)  Coordination in seeking technical assistance and expertise from the Texas Division of Emergency Management under existing programs and resources. Sec. 418.504.  USE OF EXISTING RESOURCES. The river authority and county shall utilize existing resources and personnel in fulfilling the requirements of this section. Sec. 505.505.  TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE. Both the river authority and county are encouraged to seek technical assistance from the Texas Division of Emergency Management, which shall provide guidance and support using existing resources and programs available through the division. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.